California statutes. Penal Code
-------------------------------------------

929.

As to any matter not subject to privilege, with the approval of the presiding judge of the superior court or the judge appointed by the presiding judge to supervise the grand jury, a grand jury may make available to the public part or all of the evidentiary material, findings, and other information relied upon by, or presented to, a grand jury for its final report in any civil grand jury investigation provided that the name of any person, or facts that lead to the identity of any person who provided information to the grand jury, shall not be released. Prior to granting approval pursuant to this section, a judge may require the redaction or masking of any part of the evidentiary material, findings, or other information to be released to the public including, but not limited to, the identity of witnesses and any testimony or materials of a defamatory or libelous nature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 79, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

930.

If any grand jury shall, in the report above mentioned, comment upon any person or official who has not been indicted by such grand jury such comments shall not be deemed to be privileged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

931.

All expenses of the grand jurors incurred under this article shall be paid by the treasurer of the county out of the general fund of the county upon warrants drawn by the county auditor upon the written order of the judge of the superior court of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

932.

After investigating the books and accounts of the various officials of the county, as provided in the foregoing sections of this article, the grand jury may order the district attorney of the county to institute suit to recover any money that, in the judgment of the grand jury, may from any cause be due the county. The order of the grand jury, certified by the foreman of the grand jury and filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county, shall be full authority for the district attorney to institute and maintain any such suit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 537.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

933.

(a) Each grand jury shall submit to the presiding judge of the superior court a final report of its findings and recommendations that pertain to county government matters during the fiscal or calendar year. Final reports on any appropriate subject may be submitted to the presiding judge of the superior court at any time during the term of service of a grand jury. A final report may be submitted for comment to responsible officers, agencies, or departments, including the county board of supervisors, when applicable, upon finding of the presiding judge that the report is in compliance with this title. For 45 days after the end of the term, the foreperson and his or her designees shall, upon reasonable notice, be available to clarify the recommendations of the report.

(b) One copy of each final report, together with the responses thereto, found to be in compliance with this title shall be placed on file with the clerk of the court and remain on file in the office of the clerk. The clerk shall immediately forward a true copy of the report and the responses to the State Archivist who shall retain that report and all responses in perpetuity.

(c) No later than 90 days after the grand jury submits a final report on the operations of any public agency subject to its reviewing authority, the governing body of the public agency shall comment to the presiding judge of the superior court on the findings and recommendations pertaining to matters under the control of the governing body, and every elected county officer or agency head for which the grand jury has responsibility pursuant to Section 914.1 shall comment within 60 days to the presiding judge of the superior court, with an information copy sent to the board of supervisors, on the findings and recommendations pertaining to matters under the control of that county officer or agency head and any agency or agencies which that officer or agency head supervises or controls. In any city and county, the mayor shall also comment on the findings and recommendations. All of these comments and reports shall forthwith be submitted to the presiding judge of the superior court who impaneled the grand jury. A copy of all responses to grand jury reports shall be placed on file with the clerk of the public agency and the office of the county clerk, or the mayor when applicable, and shall remain on file in those offices. One copy shall be placed on file with the applicable grand jury final report by, and in the control of the currently impaneled grand jury, where it shall be maintained for a minimum of five years.

(d) As used in this section “agency” includes a department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 538.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

933.05.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 933, as to each grand jury finding, the responding person or entity shall indicate one of the following:

(1) The respondent agrees with the finding.

(2) The respondent disagrees wholly or partially with the finding, in which case the response shall specify the portion of the finding that is disputed and shall include an explanation of the reasons therefor.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 933, as to each grand jury recommendation, the responding person or entity shall report one of the following actions:

(1) The recommendation has been implemented, with a summary regarding the implemented action.

(2) The recommendation has not yet been implemented, but will be implemented in the future, with a timeframe for implementation.

(3) The recommendation requires further analysis, with an explanation and the scope and parameters of an analysis or study, and a timeframe for the matter to be prepared for discussion by the officer or head of the agency or department being investigated or reviewed, including the governing body of the public agency when applicable. This timeframe shall not exceed six months from the date of publication of the grand jury report.

(4) The recommendation will not be implemented because it is not warranted or is not reasonable, with an explanation therefor.

(c) However, if a finding or recommendation of the grand jury addresses budgetary or personnel matters of a county agency or department headed by an elected officer, both the agency or department head and the board of supervisors shall respond if requested by the grand jury, but the response of the board of supervisors shall address only those budgetary or personnel matters over which it has some decisionmaking authority. The response of the elected agency or department head shall address all aspects of the findings or recommendations affecting his or her agency or department.

(d) A grand jury may request a subject person or entity to come before the grand jury for the purpose of reading and discussing the findings of the grand jury report that relates to that person or entity in order to verify the accuracy of the findings prior to their release.

(e) During an investigation, the grand jury shall meet with the subject of that investigation regarding the investigation, unless the court, either on its own determination or upon request of the foreperson of the grand jury, determines that such a meeting would be detrimental.

(f) A grand jury shall provide to the affected agency a copy of the portion of the grand jury report relating to that person or entity two working days prior to its public release and after the approval of the presiding judge. No officer, agency, department, or governing body of a public agency shall disclose any contents of the report prior to the public release of the final report.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 443, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

933.06.

(a) Notwithstanding Sections 916 and 940, in a county having a population of 20,000 or less, a final report may be adopted and submitted pursuant to Section 933 with the concurrence of at least 10 grand jurors if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The grand jury consisting of 19 persons has been impaneled pursuant to law, and the membership is reduced from 19 to fewer than 12.

(2) The vacancies have not been filled pursuant to Section 908.1 within 30 days from the time that the clerk of the superior court is given written notice that the vacancy has occurred.

(3) A final report has not been submitted by the grand jury pursuant to Section 933.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 933, no responsible officers, agencies, or departments shall be required to comment on a final report submitted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 854, Sec. 40.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

933.1.

A grand jury may at any time examine the books and records of a redevelopment agency, a housing authority, created pursuant to Division 24 (commencing with Section 33000) of the Health and Safety Code, or a joint powers agency created pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and, in addition to any other investigatory powers granted by this chapter, may investigate and report upon the method or system of performing the duties of such agency or authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 279, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

933.5.

A grand jury may at any time examine the books and records of any special-purpose assessing or taxing district located wholly or partly in the county or the local agency formation commission in the county, and, in addition to any other investigatory powers granted by this chapter, may investigate and report upon the method or system of performing the duties of such district or commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 306.)
-------------------------------------------

933.6.

A grand jury may at any time examine the books and records of any nonprofit corporation established by or operated on behalf of a public entity the books and records of which it is authorized by law to examine, and, in addition to any other investigatory powers granted by this chapter, may investigate and report upon the method or system of performing the duties of such nonprofit corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 279, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Legal and Other Assistants for Grand Juries [934. - 938.4.]

934.

(a) The grand jury may, at all times, request the advice of the court, or the judge thereof, the district attorney, the county counsel, or the Attorney General. Unless advice is requested, the judge of the court, or county counsel as to civil matters, shall not be present during the sessions of the grand jury.

(b) The Attorney General may grant or deny a request for advice from the grand jury. If the Attorney General grants a request for advice from the grand jury, the Attorney General shall fulfill that request within existing financial and staffing resources.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 230, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

935.

The district attorney of the county may at all times appear before the grand jury for the purpose of giving information or advice relative to any matter cognizable by the grand jury, and may interrogate witnesses before the grand jury whenever he thinks it necessary. When a charge against or involving the district attorney, or assistant district attorney, or deputy district attorney, or anyone employed by or connected with the office of the district attorney, is being investigated by the grand jury, such district attorney, or assistant district attorney, or deputy district attorney, or all or anyone or more of them, shall not be allowed to be present before such grand jury when such charge is being investigated, in an official capacity but only as a witness, and he shall only be present while a witness and after his appearance as such witness shall leave the place where the grand jury is holding its session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

936.

When requested so to do by the grand jury of any county, the Attorney General may employ special counsel and special investigators, whose duty it shall be to investigate and present the evidence in such investigation to such grand jury.

The services of such special counsel and special investigators shall be a county charge of such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

936.5.

(a) When requested to do so by the grand jury of any county, the presiding judge of the superior court may employ special counsel and special investigators, whose duty it shall be to investigate and present the evidence of the investigation to the grand jury.

(b) Prior to the appointment, the presiding judge shall conduct an evidentiary hearing and find that a conflict exists that would prevent the local district attorney, the county counsel, and the Attorney General from performing such investigation. Notice of the hearing shall be given to each of them unless he or she is a subject of the investigation. The finding of the presiding judge may be appealed by the district attorney, the county counsel, or the Attorney General. The order shall be stayed pending the appeal made under this section.

(c) The authority to appoint is contingent upon the certification by the auditor-comptroller of the county, that the grand jury has funds appropriated to it sufficient to compensate the special counsel and investigator for services rendered pursuant to the court order. In the absence of a certification the court has no authority to appoint. In the event the county board of supervisors or a member thereof is under investigation, the county has an obligation to appropriate the necessary funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 290, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

936.7.

(a) In a county of the eighth class, as defined by Sections 28020 and 28029 of the Government Code, upon a request by the grand jury, the presiding judge of the superior court may retain, in the name of the county, a special counsel to the grand jury. The request shall be presented to the presiding judge in camera, by an affidavit, executed by the foreperson of the grand jury, which specifies the reason for the request and the nature of the services sought, and which certifies that the appointment of the special counsel is reasonably necessary to aid the work of the grand jury. The affidavit shall be confidential and its contents may not be made public except by order of the presiding judge upon a showing
 of good cause. The special counsel shall be selected by the presiding judge following submission of the name of the nominee to the board of supervisors for comment.

The special counsel shall be retained under a contract executed by the presiding judge in the name of the county. The contract shall contain the following terms:

(1) The types of legal services to be rendered to the grand jury; provided, (i) that the special counsel’s duties shall not include any legal advisory, investigative, or prosecutorial service that by statute is vested within the powers of the district attorney, and (ii) that the special counsel may not perform any investigative or prosecutorial service whatsoever except upon advance written approval by the presiding judge, which specifies the number of hours of these
 services, the hourly rate therefor, and the subject matter of the inquiry.

(2) The hourly rate of compensation of the special counsel for
 legal advisory services delivered, together with a maximum contract amount payable for all services rendered under the contract during the term thereof, and all service authorizations issued pursuant thereto.

(3) That the contract may be canceled in advance of the expiration of its term by the presiding judge pursuant to service upon the special counsel of 10 days’ advance written notice.

(b) The maximum contract amount shall be determined by the board of supervisors and included in the grand jury’s annual operational budget. The maximum amount shall be subject to increase by the presiding judge through contract amendment during the term thereof, subject to and in compliance with the procedure prescribed by Section 914.5.

(c) The contract shall constitute a public record and shall be subject to public inspection and copying pursuant to the provisions of the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). However, at the sole discretion of the board of supervisors, any or all of the following steps may be taken:

(1) The nomination by the presiding judge, and any or all actions by the board of supervisors in commenting upon the nominee and the comments, may be made confidential.

(2) The deliberations and actions may be undertaken in meetings from which the public is excluded, and the communication containing comments may constitute a confidential record that is not subject to public inspection or copying except at the sole discretion
 of the board of supervisors. Moreover, any written authorization by the presiding judge pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall constitute a confidential record that is not subject to public inspection or copying except in connection with a dispute concerning compensation for services rendered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 341.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

937.

The grand jury or district attorney may require by subpoena the attendance of any person before the grand jury as interpreter. While his services are necessary, such interpreter may be present at the examination of witnesses before the grand jury. The compensation for services of such interpreter constitutes a charge against the county, and shall be fixed by the grand jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1264.)
-------------------------------------------

938.

(a) Whenever criminal causes are being investigated before the grand jury, it shall appoint a competent stenographic reporter. He shall be sworn and shall report in shorthand the testimony given in such causes and shall transcribe the shorthand in all cases where an indictment is returned or accusation presented.

(b) At the request of the grand jury, the reporter shall also prepare transcripts of any testimony reported during any session of the immediately preceding grand jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 298.)
-------------------------------------------

938.1.

(a) If an indictment has been found or accusation presented against a defendant, such stenographic reporter shall certify and deliver to the clerk of the superior court in the county an original transcription of the reporter’s shorthand notes and a copy thereof and as many additional copies as there are defendants, other than fictitious defendants, regardless of the number of charges or fictitious defendants included in the same investigation. The reporter shall complete the certification and delivery within 10 days after the indictment has been found or the accusation presented unless the court for good cause makes an order extending the time. The time shall not be extended more than 20 days. The clerk shall file the original of the transcript, deliver a copy of the transcript to the district attorney immediately upon receipt thereof and deliver a copy of such transcript to each such defendant or the defendant’s attorney. If the copy of the testimony is not served as provided in this section, the court shall on motion of the defendant continue the trial to such time as may be necessary to secure to the defendant receipt of a copy of such testimony 10 days before such trial. If several criminal charges are investigated against a defendant on one investigation and thereafter separate indictments are returned or accusations presented upon said several charges, the delivery to such defendant or the defendant’s attorney of one copy of the transcript of such investigation shall be a compliance with this section as to all of such indictments or accusations.

(b) The transcript shall not be open to the public until 10 days after its delivery to the defendant or the defendant’s attorney. Thereafter the transcript shall be open to the public unless the court orders otherwise on its own motion or on motion of a party pending a determination as to whether all or part of the transcript should be sealed. If the court determines that there is a reasonable likelihood that making all or any part of the transcript public may prejudice a defendant’s right to a fair and impartial trial, that part of the transcript shall be sealed until the defendant’s trial has been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 539.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

938.2.

(a) For preparing any transcript in any case pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 938.1, the stenographic reporter shall draw no salary or fees from the county for preparing such transcript in any case until all such transcripts of testimony in such case so taken by him are written up and delivered. Before making the order for payment to the reporter, the judge of the superior court shall require the reporter to show by affidavit or otherwise that he has written up and delivered all testimony taken by him, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 938 and Section 938.1.

(b) Before making the order for payment to a reporter who has prepared transcripts pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 938, the judge of the superior court shall require the reporter to show by affidavit or otherwise that he has written up and delivered all testimony requested of him in accordance with that sudivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 298.)
-------------------------------------------

938.3.

The services of the stenographic reporter shall constitute a charge against the county, and the stenographic reporter shall be compensated for reporting and transcribing at the same rates as prescribed in Sections 69947 to 69954, inclusive, of the Government Code, to be paid out of the county treasury on a warrant of the county auditor when ordered by the judge of the superior court.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 56.)
-------------------------------------------

938.4.

The superior court shall arrange for a suitable meeting room and other support as the court determines is necessary for the grand jury. Any costs incurred by the court as a result of this section shall be absorbed by the court or the county from existing resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 443, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Conduct of Investigations [939. - 939.91.]

939.

No person other than those specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 934), and in Sections 939.1, 939.11, and 939.21, and the officer having custody of a prisoner witness while the prisoner is testifying, is permitted to be present during the criminal sessions of the grand jury except the members and witnesses actually under examination. Members of the grand jury who have been excused pursuant to Section 939.5 shall not be present during any part of these proceedings. No persons other than grand jurors shall be permitted to be present during the expression of the opinions of the grand jurors, or the giving of their votes, on any criminal or civil matter before them.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 755, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

939.1.

The grand jury acting through its foreman and the attorney general or the district attorney may make a joint written request for public sessions of the grand jury. The request shall be filed with the superior court. If the court, or the judge thereof, finds that the subject matter of the investigation affects the general public welfare, involving the alleged corruption, misfeasance, or malfeasance in office or dereliction of duty of public officials or employees or of any person allegedly acting in conjunction or conspiracy with such officials or employees in such alleged acts, the court or judge may make an order directing the grand jury to conduct its investigation in a session or sessions open to the public. The order shall state the finding of the court. The grand jury shall comply with the order.

The conduct of such investigation and the examination of witnesses shall be by the members of the grand jury and the district attorney.

The deliberation of the grand jury and its voting upon such investigation shall be in private session. The grand jury may find indictments based wholly or partially upon the evidence introduced at such public session.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

939.11.

Any member of the grand jury who has a hearing, sight, or speech disability may request an interpreter when his or her services are necessary to assist the juror to carry out his or her duties. The request shall be filed with the superior court. If the court, or the judge thereof, finds that an interpreter is necessary, the court shall make an order to that effect and may require by subpoena the attendance of any person before the grand jury as interpreter. If the services of an interpreter are necessary, the court shall instruct the grand jury and the interpreter that the interpreter is not to participate in the jury’s deliberations in any manner except to facilitate communication between the disabled juror and the other jurors. The court shall place the interpreter under oath not to disclose any grand jury matters, including the testimony of any witness, statements of any grand juror, or the vote of any grand juror, except in the due course of judicial proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 357, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

939.2.

A subpoena requiring the attendance of a witness before the grand jury may be signed and issued by the district attorney, his investigator or, upon request of the grand jury, by any judge of the superior court, for witnesses in the state, in support of the prosecution, for those witnesses whose testimony, in his opinion is material in an investigation before the grand jury, and for such other witnesses as the grand jury, upon an investigation pending before them, may direct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1196.)
-------------------------------------------

939.21.

(a) Any prosecution witness before the grand jury in a proceeding involving a violation of Section 243.4, 261, 273a, 273d, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, or 289, subdivision (1) of Section 314, Section 368, 647.6, or former Section 288a or 647a, who is a minor or a dependent person, may, at the discretion of the prosecution, select a person of his or her own choice to attend the testimony of the prosecution witness for the purpose of providing support. The person chosen shall not be a witness in the same proceeding, or a person described in Section 1070 of the Evidence Code.

(b) The grand jury foreperson shall inform any person permitted to attend the grand jury proceedings pursuant to this section that grand jury proceedings are confidential and may not be discussed with anyone not in attendance at the proceedings. The foreperson also shall admonish that person not to prompt, sway, or influence the witness in any way. Nothing in this section shall preclude the presiding judge from exercising his or her discretion to remove a person from the grand jury proceeding whom the judge believes is prompting, swaying, or influencing the witness.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 82.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

939.3.

In any investigation or proceeding before a grand jury for any felony offense when a person refuses to answer a question or produce evidence of any other kind on the ground that he may be incriminated thereby, proceedings may be had under Section 1324.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

939.4.

The foreman may administer an oath to any witness appearing before the grand jury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

939.5.

Before considering a charge against any person, the foreman of the grand jury shall state to those present the matter to be considered and the person to be charged with an offense in connection therewith. He shall direct any member of the grand jury who has a state of mind in reference to the case or to either party which will prevent him from acting impartially and without prejudice to the substantial rights of the party to retire. Any violation of this section by the foreman or any member of the grand jury is punishable by the court as a contempt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

939.6.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), in the investigation of a charge, the grand jury shall receive no other evidence than what is:

(1) Given by witnesses produced and sworn before the grand jury;

(2) Furnished by writings, material objects, or other things presented to the senses; or

(3) Contained in a deposition that is admissible under subdivision 3 of Section 686.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the grand jury shall not receive any evidence except that which would be admissible over objection at the trial of a criminal action, but the fact that evidence that would have been excluded at trial was received by the grand jury does not render the indictment void where sufficient competent evidence to support the indictment was received by the grand jury.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 1200 of the Evidence Code, as to the evidence relating to the foundation for admissibility into evidence of documents, exhibits, records, and other items of physical evidence, the evidence to support the indictment may be based in whole or in part upon the sworn testimony of a law enforcement officer relating the statement of a declarant made out of court and offered for the truth of the matter asserted. Any law enforcement officer testifying as to a hearsay statement pursuant to this subdivision shall have either five years of law enforcement experience or have completed a training course certified by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training that includes training in the investigation and reporting of cases and testifying at preliminary hearings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 757, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

939.7.

The grand jury is not required to hear evidence for the defendant, but it shall weigh all the evidence submitted to it, and when it has reason to believe that other evidence within its reach will explain away the charge, it shall order the evidence to be produced, and for that purpose may require the district attorney to issue process for the witnesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

939.71.

(a) If the prosecutor is aware of exculpatory evidence, the prosecutor shall inform the grand jury of its nature and existence. Once the prosecutor has informed the grand jury of exculpatory evidence pursuant to this section, the prosecutor shall inform the grand jury of its duties under Section 939.7. If a failure to comply with the provisions of this section results in substantial prejudice, it shall be grounds for dismissal of the portion of the indictment related to that evidence.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature by enacting this section to codify the holding in Johnson v. Superior Court, 15 Cal. 3d 248, and to affirm the duties of the grand jury pursuant to Section 939.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 22, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

939.8.

The grand jury shall find an indictment when all the evidence before it, taken together, if unexplained or uncontradicted, would, in its judgment, warrant a conviction by a trial jury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

939.9.

A grand jury shall make no report, declaration, or recommendation on any matter except on the basis of its own investigation of the matter made by such grand jury. A grand jury shall not adopt as its own the recommendation of another grand jury unless the grand jury adopting such recommendation does so after its own investigation of the matter as to which the recommendation is made, as required by this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 501.)
-------------------------------------------

939.91.

(a) A grand jury which investigates a charge against a person, and as a result thereof cannot find an indictment against such person, shall, at the request of such person and upon the approval of the court which impaneled the grand jury, report or declare that a charge against such person was investigated and that the grand jury could not as a result of the evidence presented find an indictment. The report or declaration shall be issued upon completion of the investigation of the suspected criminal conduct, or series of related suspected criminal conduct, and in no event beyond the end of the grand jury’s term.

(b) A grand jury shall, at the request of the person called and upon the approval of the court which impaneled the grand jury, report or declare that any person called before the grand jury for a purpose, other than to investigate a charge against such person, was called only as a witness to an investigation which did not involve a charge against such person. The report or declaration shall be issued upon completion of the investigation of the suspected criminal conduct, or series of related suspected criminal conduct, and in no event beyond the end of the grand jury’s term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 467.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 5. THE PLEADINGS [940. - 973.]



  CHAPTER 1. Finding and Presentment of the Indictment [940. - 945.]

940.

An indictment cannot be found without concurrence of at least 14 grand jurors in a county in which the required number of members of the grand jury prescribed by Section 888.2 is 23, at least eight grand jurors in a county in which the required number of members is 11, and at least 12 grand jurors in all other counties. When so found it shall be endorsed, “A true bill,” and the endorsement shall be signed by the foreman of the grand jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 295, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

943.

When an indictment is found, the names of the witnesses examined before the Grand Jury, or whose depositions may have been read before them, must be inserted at the foot of the indictment, or indorsed thereon, before it is presented to the Court.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

944.

An indictment, when found by the grand jury, must be presented by their foreman, in their presence, to the court, and must be filed with the clerk. No recommendation as to the dollar amount of bail to be fixed shall be made to any court by any grand jury.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 695.)
-------------------------------------------

945.

When an indictment is found against a defendant not in custody, the same proceedings must be had as are prescribed in Sections 979 to 984, inclusive, against a defendant who fails to appear for arraignment.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Rules of Pleading [948. - 973.]

948.

All the forms of pleading in criminal actions, and the rules by which the sufficiency of pleadings is to be determined, are those prescribed by this Code.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

949.

The first pleading on the part of the people in the superior court in a felony case is the indictment, information, or the complaint in any case certified to the superior court under Section 859a. The first pleading on the part of the people in a misdemeanor or infraction case is the complaint except as otherwise provided by law. The first pleading on the part of the people in a proceeding pursuant to Section 3060 of the Government Code is an accusation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 373.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

950.

The accusatory pleading must contain:

1. The title of the action, specifying the name of the court to which the same is presented, and the names of the parties;

2. A statement of the public offense or offenses charged therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

951.

An indictment or information may be in substantially the following form: The people of the State of California against A. B. In the superior court of the State of California, in and for the county of ____. The grand jury (or the district attorney) of the county of ____ hereby accuses A. B. of a felony (or misdemeanor), to wit: (giving the name of the crime, as murder, burglary, etc.), in that on or about the ____ day of ____, 19__, in the county of ____, State of California, he (here insert statement of act or omission, as for example, “murdered C. D.”).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1927, Ch. 613.)
-------------------------------------------

952.

In charging an offense, each count shall contain, and shall be sufficient if it contains in substance, a statement that the accused has committed some public offense therein specified. Such statement may be made in ordinary and concise language without any technical averments or any allegations of matter not essential to be proved. It may be in the words of the enactment describing the offense or declaring the matter to be a public offense, or in any words sufficient to give the accused notice of the offense of which he is accused. In charging theft it shall be sufficient to allege that the defendant unlawfully took the labor or property of another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1929, Ch. 159.)
-------------------------------------------

953.

When a defendant is charged by a fictitious or erroneous name, and in any stage of the proceedings his true name is discovered, it must be inserted in the subsequent proceedings, referring to the fact of his being charged by the name mentioned in the accusatory pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

954.
